Maryland, session 2026, SB0150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
2.5–103.
(a) This section applies only to a unit that establishes a process under subsection
(b) of this section.
– 1 –

Ch. 491 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Each unit may establish a process to include a notation indicating veteran
status on a license OR PUBLIC PROFILE.
(c) (1) An application for an initial license or renewal license issued by a unit
shall allow the applicant to:
(i) request that a notation of the applicant’s veteran status be
included on the license OR PUBLIC PROFILE; and
(ii) provide affirmative consent to being contacted by appropriate
Executive Branch agencies regarding the applicant’s eligibility for State or federal
veterans’ benefits.
(2) An applicant for an initial license or a renewal license shall submit to
the unit one of the following as certification of veteran status:
(i) a certification of veteran status obtained from the Department of
Veterans and Military Families in accordance with § 9–905 of the State Government
Article;
(ii) a federal Certificate of Release or Discharge from Active Duty
(DD Form 214); or
(iii) any other documentation acceptable to the unit.
(d) If an applicant for an initial license or a renewal license submits the
documentation required under subsection (c)(2) of this section, the unit shall include a
notation of veteran status on the license OR PUBLIC PROFILE.
(e) In accordance with §§ 4–304 through 4–325 of the General Provisions Article
and any other applicable law, and on request by an Executive Branch agency, a unit shall
electronically transmit to the Executive Branch agency appropriate information about each
applicant for an initial license or a renewal license who consents to being contacted under
subsection (c)(1) of this section.
Article – Environment
1–206.
(a) The Department may establish a process in collaboration with one or more
boards under the Department’s direction and control that requires a board to include a
notation indicating veteran status on a professional license [or], certificate, OR PUBLIC
PROFILE.
(b) If the Department establishes the process described in subsection (a) of this
section, an application for a professional license or certificate shall allow an applicant to:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 491
(1) Present a certification of veteran status obtained from the Department
of Veterans and Military Families in accordance with § 9–905 of the State Government
Article, a DD Form 214, or other documentation acceptable to the board certifying veteran
status; and
(2) Indicate that the applicant consents to:
(i) Having a notation on the applicant’s professional license [or],
certificate, OR PUBLIC PROFILE indicating that the applicant is a veteran; and
(ii) Being contacted by appropriate Executive Branch agencies
regarding the applicant’s eligibility for State or federal veterans benefits.
(c) If an applicant presents the required documentation and consents in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section, a board shall:
(1) Include on the applicant’s professional license [or], certificate, OR
PUBLIC PROFILE a notation indicating that the applicant is a veteran; and
(2) In accordance with §§ 4–304 through 4–325 of the General Provisions
Article and any other applicable law, and on request from an Executive Branch agency,
electronically transmit to the Executive Branch agency appropriate information about the
applicant.
(d) The Department and applicable boards may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Article – Health Occupations
1–707.
(a) Each health occupations board may establish a process to include a notation
indicating veteran status on a license, certificate, registration, or public profile.
(b) If a health occupations board establishes the process described in subsection
(a) of this section, an application for a license, certificate, OR registration[, or public profile]
shall allow an applicant to:
(1) Present a certification of veteran status obtained from the Department
of Veterans and Military Families in accordance with § 9–905 of the State Government
Article, a DD Form 214, or other documentation acceptable to the health occupations board
certifying veteran status; and
(2) Indicate that the applicant consents to:
– 3 –

Ch. 491 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) Having a notation on the applicant’s license, certificate,
registration, or public profile indicating that the applicant is a veteran; and
(ii) Being contacted by appropriate Executive Branch agencies
regarding the applicant’s eligibility for State or federal veterans benefits.
(c) If an applicant presents the required documentation and consents in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section, a health occupations board shall:
(1) Include on the applicant’s license, certification, registration, or public
profile a notation indicating that the applicant is a veteran; and
(2) In accordance with §§ 4–304 through 4–325 of the General Provisions
Article and any other applicable law, and on request from an Executive Branch agency,
electronically transmit to the Executive Branch agency appropriate information about the
applicant.
(d) Each health occupations board may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
4–211.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Executive agency” means a unit of the Executive Branch of State
government.
(3) “Identification card” means a security card issued by the Department
to a State employee or other individual authorized by the Secretary, including a contractor,
regulated lobbyist, media personnel, local government official, or volunteer.
(b) (1) The Department may include a notation on an identification card OR
PUBLIC PROFILE indicating that the holder is a veteran if the individual issued the
identification card presents a certification of veteran status obtained from the Department
of Veterans and Military Families in accordance with § 9–905 of the State Government
Article, a DD Form 214, or other documentation acceptable to the Department.
(2) The Department may limit the notation authorized by paragraph (1) of
this subsection to a certain category or categories of identification card holders.
(c) (1) If the Department provides an option for a notation on an identification
card OR PUBLIC PROFILE that indicates that the holder is a veteran, the Department shall
include on the application for the identification card the option for the applicant to:
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 491
(i) indicate that the applicant is a veteran; and
(ii) consent to being contacted by appropriate executive agencies
regarding the individual’s eligibility for State or federal veterans’ benefits.
(2) (i) In accordance with Title 4, Subtitle 3 of the General Provisions
Article and any other applicable law, and on request by an executive agency, the
Department shall transmit to the executive agency appropriate information about each
identification card holder who has given consent under paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.
(ii) Unless otherwise authorized or required by law, the Department
may not transmit information obtained on an application for an identification card that
relates to the applicant’s status as a veteran unless the applicant has given consent under
paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection.
(d) The Department may adopt regulations to carry out this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –